Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-316
State Board of Education; members; impeachment; grounds.

Members of the State Board of Education shall be liable to impeachment in the same manner and on the same grounds as other state officers.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 6, p. 1055;

Laws 1971, LB 421, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-326;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 144.